Wisconsin, session 2025, AB215.
do enact as follows:AB215,11Section 1. 786.37 (4) of the statutes is renumbered 786.37 (4) (intro.) and 2amended to read:AB215,2,83786.37 (4) (intro.) If a petitioner requests that his or her the petitioner’s 4petition to change or establish a name remain confidential, the clerk of court shall 5ensure that the name change petition is confidential upon the filing of the petition 6and sub. (1) does not apply to the petitioner. The court may require the petitioner to 7comply with sub. (1) if the petitioner is unable to show, by a preponderance of the 8evidence, that publication all of the following:AB215,2,109(a) 1. Publication of his or her the petition could endanger him or her and that 10he or she the petitioner.AB215,2,1211(b) That the petitioner is not seeking a name change in order to avoid a debt or 12conceal a criminal record.AB215,213Section 2. 786.37 (4) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is created to read:AB215,2,1414786.37 (4) (a) (intro.) That any of the following applies to the petitioner:AB215,315Section 3. 786.37 (4) (a) 2. of the statutes is created to read:AB215,3,21786.37 (4) (a) 2. The petitioner is seeking a name change to conform with the 2petitioner’s gender identity.AB215,43Section 4. Initial applicability.AB215,3,54(1) This act first applies to a petition to change or establish a name filed on 5the effective date of this subsection.AB215,56Section 5. Effective date.AB215,3,87(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 6th month beginning after 8publication.AB215,3,99